California, session 20252026, AB2411.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature find and declares all of the following:(a) The purpose of this act is to safeguard public safety within a reasonable timeframe before, during, and after the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games in accordance with state and local law.(b) The City of Los Angeles is the host city for the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games and the city and other local, state, and federal agencies are responsible for ensuring the safety of all participants and visitors who may travel to southern California in connection with games-related activities, in addition to their existing responsibilities to ensure the safety of residents and the safeguarding of public and private property.(c) It is critical that local jurisdictions have the means and ability to identify and utilize additional law enforcement personnel in order to ensure a secure and peaceful 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games, including the ability to receive assistance from other law enforcement agencies, including those outside of the State of California.(d) Existing law limits the extension of mutual aid by California local agencies to circumstances of local emergency due to conditions of disaster or of extreme peril.(e) It is therefore the intent of the Legislature to ensure that the Office of Emergency Services may enter into agreements to utilize the services and support of other agencies, including those outside of the State of California, in connection with the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games, to secure additional law enforcement personnel, under the following conditions:(1) That all law enforcement personnel augmenting a local agency public safety force do so on a temporary basis and within a reasonable timeframe before, during, and after the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games.(2) That all out-of-state law enforcement personnel obtain a certificate of training from the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training via the implementation of a streamlined training program that is designed to facilitate adequate, tailored training of out-of-state law enforcement personnel for the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games.(3) That all law enforcement personnel perform their duties in compliance with all state and local laws and ordinances.(f) It is the intent of the Legislature that California peace officers shall be the primary and preferred source of law enforcement personnel for the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games. The services of out-of-state law enforcement personnel shall be utilized only to augment available California resources.SEC. 2. Section 8591.6.5 is added to the Government Code, to read:8591.6.5. COPPSC (a) For the purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:(1) “California Olympic and Paralympic Public Safety Command” or “command” means the California Olympic and Paralympic Public Safety Command established pursuant to Section 8591.5.(2) “Commission” means the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training.(3) “General law enforcement duties” are duties that include the investigation of crime, patrol of a geographic area, responding to the full range of requests for police services, and performing any enforcement action on the full range of law violations.(4) “Out-of-state law enforcement personnel” means a peace officer or other sworn law enforcement officer employed by and acting on behalf of a law enforcement agency or public safety agency outside this state and assigned to provide general law enforcement services in this state pursuant to this section.(5) “Temporary deployment” means a limited-duration assignment, not exceeding 120 calendar days, of out-of-state law enforcement personnel to assist with public safety functions in connection with the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games.(b) The Office of Emergency Services shall negotiate and enter into agreements to facilitate training, mutual cooperation, and sharing of information and resources related to the use temporary deployment of law enforcement personnel with other state and local agencies within and outside of the State of California for the purposes of ensuring public safety for the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games in Los Angeles. The agreement shall comply with all of the following:(a)Law enforcement personnel contracted to support public safety in connection with the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games shall do so for a limited period of time that falls within a reasonable timeframe before, during, and after the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games.(b)Law enforcement personnel contracted from an out-of-state agency to augment security functions in connection with the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games shall obtain a certificate of training pursuant to Section 13519.16 of the Penal Code.(c)Law enforcement personnel contracted from an out-of-state agency to augment security functions in connection with the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games shall abide by state and local law.(c) Out-of-state law enforcement personnel shall not be deployed pursuant to this section unless all of the following conditions are met:(1) The command receives written certification from the employing agency of the out-of-state law enforcement personnel that each individual proposed for deployment meets all applicable selection standards of the officer’s employing agency, including, but not limited to, the absence of any disqualifying conduct or conviction, satisfaction of moral character requirements, and completion of all hiring standards required for their peace officers.(2) The commission issues a temporary proof of eligibility or other authorization, in a form and manner determined by the commission, for the duration of the deployment.(3) During the term of deployment, the out-of-state law enforcement personnel shall comply with applicable California laws and regulations governing peace officers. Upon receipt of a complaint, charge, or allegation of serious misconduct against out-of-state law enforcement personnel, the California law enforcement agency supervising the out-of-state personnel shall notify the commission, and the commission shall immediately report the complaint, charge, or allegation to the out-of-state law enforcement agency where the personnel is currently employed and shall also report the same facts to the respective peace officer standards and training or certifying agency of that state.(4) The executive director of the commission may suspend or rescind the temporary proof of eligibility or other authorization for any out-of-state law enforcement personnel upon receipt of a complaint, charge, or allegation of serious misconduct. Out-of-state personnel may be subject to disciplinary action from their state of origin, including, but not limited to, decertification.(5) The command and the employing California law enforcement agency enter into a written memorandum of understanding governing command authority, operational control, supervision, liability allocation, training, reporting, and any other conditions the command deems necessary to ensure compliance with this section.(d) Out-of-state law enforcement personnel deployed pursuant to this section shall:(1) Operate exclusively under the command and control of the command or a designated California law enforcement agency supervisor identified in the applicable memorandum of understanding.(2) Comply with all of California’s local law enforcement agency’s use-of-force policies, incident reporting requirements, and other operational policies applicable to California peace officers assigned to comparable duties.(3) Be limited to general law enforcement duties, unless the person has obtained any additional certification or authorization required by the commission for the performance of investigative functions.(e) (1) The command, in coordination with appropriate agencies, shall, on or before January 1, 2029, submit a report to the Assembly and Senate Public Safety Committees that includes all of the following:(A) The number of out-of-state personnel deployed pursuant to this section.(B) The number and type of any use-of-force incidents involving out-of-state personnel.(C) The number and disposition of complaints, charges, or allegations of serious misconduct, or other disciplinary actions involving out-of-state personnel.(D) Any identified training deficiencies, policy compliance issues, or operational concerns relating to out-of-state personnel.(E) Any recommendations for legislative action based on the deployment of out-of-state personnel.(2) (A) The requirement for submitting a report imposed under paragraph (1) is inoperative on January 1, 2033, pursuant to Section 10231.5.(B) A report to be submitted pursuant to paragraph (1) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795.(f) This section shall apply only to the deployment of out-of-state personnel in connection with the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games and shall not be construed to establish any precedent for future permanent changes to peace officer selection, training, certification, or decertification standards outside those games.SEC. 3. Section 830.45 is added to the Penal Code, to read:830.45. (a) Any regularly employed law enforcement officer outside of the state of California is a peace officer in this state for the purposes of assisting local law enforcement agencies with the prevention and detection of crime and the general enforcement of the criminal laws of this state for the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games and only if all of the following conditions are met:(1) The officer is providing support and assistance to local law enforcement agencies with the prevention and detection of crime and the general enforcement of the criminal laws of this state during the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games.(2) The officer has successfully completed, at a minimum, a basic general law enforcement training course of training in their home state as is required to perform general law enforcement functions and duties.(3) The officer has at least a minimum of two years of continuous full-time, out-of-state experience performing general law enforcement duties and is currently in good standing with their employing law enforcement agency.(4) The officer has received a certificate of training issued by the California Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training pursuant to Section 13519.16.(5) The officer has not been found to have committed any acts that would constitute serious misconduct had they been committed in California, and has obtained authorization from the officer’s employing agency to serve as a peace officer during the Games in accordance with this section.(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any person who is acting as a peace officer in this state in the manner described in this section shall be deemed to have met the requirements of Section 1031 of the Government Code and the selection and training standards of the Commission on Peace Officer Standards and Training as long as the officer has completed the basic training required for peace officers in their home state.(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.SEC. 3.SEC. 4. Section 13519.16 is added to the Penal Code, to read:13519.16. (a) The commission shall establish a streamlined training program for out-of-state law enforcement personnel that are utilized for purposes of public safety support within a reasonable timeframe before, during, and after the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games assisting local law enforcement agencies with the prevention and detection of crime and the general enforcement of the criminal laws of this state for a period of time not exceeding 120 calendar days pursuant to Section 8591.6.5 of the Government Code. The streamlined training program shall comply with all of the following:(1) The streamlined training program shall satisfy key requirements for qualifications under the Peace Officer Standards and Training (POST) program, as described in Section 13510.1, that are include training as determined by the commission to be necessary for the unique conditions of the use of out-of-state law enforcement personnel to assist local law enforcement agencies with law enforcement operations during the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games.(2) The streamlined training program shall be used only for out-of-state law enforcement personnel who are intended to be utilized for the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games. Games, and who meet the specific requirements of Section 830.45.(3) The commission shall award issue out-of-state law enforcement personnel that complete the training program a certificate of training. The certificate of training shall only be valid within a reasonable timeframe before, during, and after during the officer’s period of service in connection with the 2028 Olympic and Paralympic Games. Games but in no case beyond a period of 120 calendar days.(b) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.